Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.50.030

Penalty.

(1) A violation of RCW 9A.50.020 is a gross misdemeanor. A person convicted of violating RCW 9A.50.020 shall be punished as follows:

(a) For a first offense, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars and a jail term of not less than twenty-four consecutive hours;

(b) For a second offense, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars and a jail term of not less than seven consecutive days; and

(c) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and a jail term of not less than thirty consecutive days.

(2) The fines imposed by this section apply to adult offenders only.

[ 2015 c 265 s 17; 1993 c 128 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.